Utah statutes.
20A-4-104.   Counting ballots electronically.
(1) (a)  Before beginning to count ballot sheets using automatic tabulating
equipment, the election officer shall test the automatic tabulating equipment
to ensure that it will accurately count the votes cast for all offices and all
measures.
(b)  The election officer shall publish public notice of the time and place of
the test at least 48 hours before the test in one or more daily or weekly
newspapers of general circulation published in the county, municipality, or
jurisdiction where the equipment is used.
(c)  The election officer shall conduct the test by processing a preaudited
group of ballot sheets.
(d)  The election officer shall ensure that:
(i)  a predetermined number of valid votes for each candidate and measure are
recorded on the ballot sheets;
(ii)  for each office, one or more ballot sheets have votes in excess of the
number allowed by law in order to test the ability of the automatic tabulating
equipment to reject those votes; and
(iii)  a different number of valid votes are assigned to each candidate for an
office, and for and against each measure.
(e)  If any error is detected, the election officer shall determine the cause
of the error and correct it.
(f)  The election officer shall ensure that:
(i)  the automatic tabulating equipment produces an errorless count before
beginning the actual counting; and
(ii)  the automatic tabulating equipment passes the same test at the end of
the count before the election returns are approved as official.
(2) (a)  The election officer or his designee shall supervise and direct all
proceedings at the counting center.
(b) (i)  Proceedings at the counting center are public and may be observed by
interested persons.
(ii)  Only those persons authorized to participate in the count may touch any
ballot, ballot sheet, or return.
(c)  The election officer shall deputize and administer an oath or affirmation
to all persons who are engaged in processing and counting the ballots that
they will faithfully perform their assigned duties.
(d) (i)  Counting poll watchers appointed as provided in Section 20A-3-201 may
observe the testing of equipment and actual counting of the ballot sheets.
(ii)  Those counting poll watchers may make independent tests of the equipment
before or after the vote count as long as the testing does not interfere in
any way with the official tabulation of the ballot sheets.
(3)  If any ballot sheet is damaged or defective so that it cannot properly be
counted by the automatic tabulating equipment, the election officer shall:
(a)  cause a true duplicate copy of the ballot sheet to be made with an
identifying serial number;
(b)  substitute the duplicate for the damaged ballot sheet;
(c)  label the duplicate ballot card "duplicate"; and
(d)  record the duplicate ballot sheet's serial number on the damaged or
defective ballot sheet.
(4)  The election officer may:
(a)  conduct an unofficial count before conducting the official count in order
to provide early unofficial returns to the public;
(b)  release unofficial returns from time to time after the polls close; and
(c)  report the progress of the count for each candidate during the actual
counting of ballots.
(5)  The election officer shall review and evaluate the provisional ballot
envelopes and prepare any valid provisional ballots for counting as provided
in Section 20A-4-107.
(6) (a)  The election officer or his designee shall:
(i)  separate, count, and tabulate any ballots containing valid write-in
votes; and
(ii)  complete the standard form provided by the clerk for recording valid
write-in votes.
(b)  In counting the write-in votes, if, by casting a valid write-in vote, a
voter has cast more votes for an office than that voter is entitled to vote
for that office, the poll workers shall count the valid write-in vote as being
the obvious intent of the voter.
(7) (a)  The election officer shall certify the return printed by the
automatic tabulating equipment, to which have been added write-in and absentee
votes, as the official return of each voting precinct.
(b)  Upon completion of the count, the election officer shall make official
returns open to the public.
(8)  If for any reason it becomes impracticable to count all or a part of the
ballot sheets with tabulating equipment, the election officer may direct that
they be counted manually according to the procedures and requirements of this
part.
(9)  After the count is completed, the election officer shall seal and retain
the programs, test materials, and ballots as provided in Section 20A-4-202.
